Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-221
Medical examination; cost to applicant as condition of employment; unlawful; cost to employer.

It shall be unlawful for any employer, as defined in section 48-220, to require any applicant for employment, to pay the cost of a medical examination required by the employer as a condition of employment. When the employer requests an applicant for a position to submit to a medical examination, the employer shall assume the cost thereof.

Laws 1963, c. 280, § 2, p. 837.